Utah statutes.
59-2-1213.   Statement required of renter claimant.

Every renter claimant under this part shall supply to the commission, in support of the claim, a statement showing reasonable proof of rent paid, the name and address of the owner or managing agent of the property rented, and any changes of residence.

